_	Further to this, the Court opined that the right to education implied the right to be educated in the national language, and did not include the provision that the parent’s linguistic preferences be respected.
_	Metro agreed a month later to the plan, with the provision that $90 million per year would be spent to begin work on the inner-city portion of the Green Line (the Gallery Place, Waterfront, and Navy Yard stations).
_	Burden then approached Kennedy and apologized for his racist past, agreeing to sell Kennedy the deed to the Redneck Shop with the provision that store owner, John Howard, would be allowed to run the shop until his death.
_	Among the U.S. reservations to the CISG is the provision that the CISG will apply only as to contracts with parties located in other CISG Contracting States, a reservation permitted by the CISG in Article 95.
_	The ICC granted the request in 1954 on the provision that the line was offered for sale to an individual or a group of locals from Yancey County.
_	Upon his death, Otto willed the diary's copyright to the Fonds, on the provision that the first 80,000 Swiss francs in income each year was to be distributed to his heirs.
_	The initial intent was to produce maps of the highest possible quality, but the expense (incurred by the landowners) led to the provision that the accuracy of the maps would be testified by the seal of the commissioners, and only maps of suitable quality would be so sealed.
_	The Communist Party of China proposed amending the Constitution, for the first time after 2004, including writing Scientific Outlook on Development and Xi Jinping Thought into the Preamble, and removing the provision that the President and Vice President "shall serve no more than two consecutive terms" from the Constitution.
_	Notable were also the provision that forbade simultaneous membership in the PSDMR and in other political organizations, and the one requiring any dispute among members to be first discussed within the party.
_	Notable exceptions in the US are the NJ Transit River Line from Camden to Trenton and Austin's Capital MetroRail, which have received exemptions to the provision that light rail operations occur only during daytime hours and Conrail freight service only at night, with several hours separating one operation from the other.
_	In 1996, the city of Los Angeles sold the theatre to the American Cinematheque for a nominal one dollar with the provision that the landmark building be restored to its original grandeur and re-opened as a movie theatre.
_	After three years in prison, Cruella de Vil has been cured of her desire for fur coats by Dr. Pavlov and is released into the custody of the probation office on the provision that she will be forced to pay the remainder of her fortune (eight million pounds) to all the dog shelters in the borough of Westminster should she repeat her crime.
_	On June 28, 1902, a joint resolution of the House and Senate appropriated $100,000 for the memorial construction under the provision that an additional $100,000 be raised from other sources.
_	Conversely, a mage would be admitted onto a steam train only on the provision that he take a third-class seat on the last caboose, so as not to cause interference with the engine (despite there being no in-game mechanic by which even the powerful mages can affect it).
_	In September 1883, Lord Ripon sanctioned the extension of the branch line with the provision that the name should be changed from "Kokilamukh Tramway" to "Kokilamukh State Railway".
_	He was nominated to the episcopacy by King Philip II of Spain, and, on 11 September 1577, Vincenzo Cutelli was appointed by Pope Gregory XIII as Bishop of Catania, with the provision that he pay annual pensions out of his episcopal income to two persons to be named by the Pope.
_	In March 1998, the Tourism Board approved the funding for the festival, but with the provision that the organiser be the Sarawak Tourism Board.
_	However, the provision that the protests center around—the stripping of collective bargaining rights—could still be passed as a separate bill even in the absence of the Senate Democrats, because it had no fiscal impact on the state.
_	The Act included the provision that of the used, no more than could be corn-based ethanol.
_	On 2 December 1972, a new Convention was concluded with the provision that when it entered into force, it would replace the 1956 Convention for the parties that ratify it.
_	One of the most important points of the treaty was the provision that the navigation was to be open in the Dardanelles in times of peace and war alike to all vessels of commerce and war, no matter under what flag, thus, in effect, leading to internationalization of the waters.
_	When "Lusitania" was built, her construction and operating expenses were subsidised by the British government, with the provision that she could be converted to an Armed Merchant Cruiser if need be.
_	In 1609, a Basilian monastery was founded by Reres with the provision that the Greek rite would be used.
_	Josephine sued 20th Century Fox for $50,000, but with the provision that Wyatt's name be removed from the title, and after she received $5,000, the movie was released as "Frontier Marshal" starring Randolph Scott playing Wyatt Earp.
_	Most provisions were upheld, but the court found that the mandatory spending limit imposed was unconstitutional, as was the limit placed on campaign spending from the candidate's personal fortune and the provision that limited independent expenditures by individuals and organizations supporting but not officially linked to a campaign.
_	The ITA eventually persuaded both applicants to merge their bids to obtain the new franchise, on the provision that a greater stake of investment in the station was offered to Catholic sources.
_	The OIFA approved the loan request on February 24, 1993, on the provision that Johnson approach an Ada-based bank to obtain a loan for the remaining $1 million to complete the transaction and that the trust authority be paid in full in the form of a balloon payment by year three of the 15-year loan term.
_	In his Will, Johnson left the collection to the City of Philadelphia with the provision that it be exhibited at 510 South Broad Street.
_	The helicopters had been provided by Australia without weapons and on the provision that they would not be used for combat; however, the PNGDF subsequently fitted machine-guns in contravention of the agreement and later used them as gunships.
_	Specifically, the provision that allowed claims to be filed in state court under the act without the possibility of removal to federal court amounted to a waiver of the procedural protections federal civil procedure might grant to a plaintiff.
_	In November 2005, after successfully completing the program, Love was discharged from the rehab center under the provision that she complete further outpatient rehab.
_	He thus made his nephew Theobald II Russell his heir, apparently with the provision that he should change his name to Gorges, bear the ancient Gorges armourials and inherit the bulk of the Gorges lands, including Wraxall, Somerset, 6 miles west of Bristol.
_	Ballot Language: "Shall the Charter be amended to eliminate the provision that elects a candidate for Mayor, City Attorney, or Councilmember to office if the candidate receives a majority vote in the June primary election, and instead require a run-off election at the November general election between the two candidates who received the most votes in the primary election?"
_	The commission award for the memorial had been made in 1908 and a contract to Allward authorized in 1909, based on an initial cost estimate of $25,000 with the provision that the work would be completed by 1912.
_	The electorate of the new constituency was 634, and the reformed franchise being more restrictive than that which had previously operated, it was only the provision that preserved the rights of existing voters for life that prevented the new electorate from being as small as the old one.
_	"The Salt Lake Tribune" published that the transgression involved the provision that prohibits premarital sex.
_	The second law restored the right of appeal to the people which had been suspended during the two decemvirates and added the provision that no official exempt from the right of appeal was to be appointed and in the case of such an appointment anyone could lawfully kill him.
_	In 1992, the project was reviewed again and rejected with the provision that it would be revisited ten years later.
_	The initial intention was to produce maps of the highest possible quality, but the expense (incurred by the landowners) led to the provision that the accuracy of the maps would be testified by the seal of the commissioners, and only maps of suitable quality would be so sealed.
_	Impressed, he wishes to produce her but Billie raises concerns about her contract with Timothy and he eventually agrees on the provision that Dice pays him $100,000.
_	Upon payment of the entrance fee, the participants were allowed to practise before the Championship on the twelve available courts with the provision that on Saturdays and during the croquet championship week, held the week before the tennis tournament, the croquet players had the first choice of courts.
_	In the Peace of Rijswijk (1697), he was restored to many of the possessions which had been taken by the French, with the provision that the Electorate of the Palatinate not revert to Protestantism.
_	In Japan, for example, the SOFA includes the provision that service members are not turned over to the local authorities until they are charged in a court.
_	In 1808 the council of the church in Schwyz sold the island to General Ludwig Auf der Maur on the provision that he rebuild the chapel.
_	The case highlighted disagreements over the precise meaning of one phrase in the Citizenship Clause—namely, the provision that a person born in the United States who is "subject to the jurisdiction thereof" acquires automatic citizenship.
_	A wrist-based design was decided upon, with the provision that it look far different from the watch Dick Tracy had been using for decades previous.
_	Pollock v. Farmers' Loan & Trust Company, , "affirmed on rehearing", , with a ruling of 5–4, was a landmark case in which the Supreme Court of the United States ruled that the unapportioned income taxes on interest, dividends and rents imposed by the Income Tax Act of 1894 were, in effect, direct taxes, and were unconstitutional because they violated the provision that direct taxes be apportioned.
_	Section 921, from the provision that specifies a person
_	Under the limited review permitted by the 1972 Supreme Court ruling in "Kleindienst v. Mandel", the panel concluded that the "record does not establish that the consular officer who denied the visa confronted Ramadan with the allegation that he had knowingly rendered material support to a terrorist organization, thereby precluding an adequate opportunity for Ramadan to attempt to satisfy the provision that exempts a visa applicant from exclusion under the 'material support' subsection if he 'can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that [he] did not know, and should not reasonably have known, that the organization was a terrorist organization.'"
_	To facilitate more performances of the work, the full score also includes the provision that it may be performed by a reduced orchestra of two flutes (second doubling piccolo), one oboe, cor anglais, two clarinets, two bassoons, four horns, three trumpets, three trombones, tuba, timpani, percussion, one harp, and strings.
_	The bridge and widening were approved with the provision that Warren Street only be widened as far as Schuylkill Avenue as not to build a bypass route through a residential area.
_	Section 67 subsequently ran into controversy after the government used the section to enforce a partial ban on pornography in India with activists questioning the vague definition of "obscene" in the provision that could be used to curtail any sexually explicit material.
_	At about 2:30 a.m. Neal had the lawyer review with Dean the agreement, including the provision that if any testimony he had already given proved materially false, he could be prosecuted for perjury.
_	Bumpsey comes around to accepting the marriage of Valentine and Jane, and even bestows half his wealth, a sum of £500, on the young couple — with the provision that he will treat his share of the wealth as Valentine does his.
_	In 1912 a Danish Royal decree established compulsory primary education, with the provision that teaching was in Danish.
_	Judging by the provision that the Romans and Latins were to share booty on an equal basis, it is likely that the treaty required the Latins to contribute roughly the same number of troops to joint operations as Rome.
_	The authors of the bill agreed to amend some provisions, such as making sex education optional, removal of an "ideal family size" of two children, removal of the provision that orders business to provide reproductive health services to their employees, among others.
_	A subsidiary group of the Adventist Church purchased the old hotel building and other buildings on the site from the Federal government in June 1947 at a 100% discount with the provision that $150,000 be raised by October 1947 to be used toward converting the building for hospital use.
_	The acquisition included the provision that the majority shareholders (the Swiss government and large Swiss companies) be offered payment if Lufthansa's share price outperforms an airline index during the years following the merger.
_	Taylor was given a $1 million interest-free, 25-year loan by Generals owner Donald Trump on December 14, 1983, with the provision that he begin playing in the USFL in 1988.
_	The 1935 amendment included the provision that, as a condition to the taking of any highway into the State Highway‑System, the State Highway Commission may require the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which such highway is situated to pay the cost of the right of way therefor or such portion thereof as the State Highway Commission shall deem equitable.
_	The amendment removed the provisions of the bill that provided war claims to people for the World War II Japanese occupation of Guam and the provision that allowed the requirement than some federal grants be matched with local funds in order to be awarded.
_	On November 29, 1895, Stephenson deeded the land to the Susquehanna Park Holiness Camp Meeting Association with the provision that it always be used for a holiness camp meeting.
_	He pledged £5000 towards the proposal, on the provision that the government supply a site and trade unions contribute the majority of funds.
_	The Spanish crown licensed mining sites with the provision that a fifth of the proceeds, the "quinto" would go to the crown.
_	Bellotti v. Baird, , was a United States Supreme Court case in which the Court upheld a Massachusetts law requiring parental consent to a minor's abortion, under the provision that "if one or both of the [minor]'s parents refuse... consent, consent may be obtained by order of a judge... for good cause shown."
_	Hays, who was expecting to be discharged several months later, made plans with Phelan to make a claim for Hays nearby on the provision that Hays would later reimburse Phelan.
_	The Parrs Wood estate passed to his nephew after his death, and remained in the family until in the 1920s, when it was sold to the Manchester Corporation, on the provision that it would be used for educational purposes.
_	In 1993 the house was donated to the Deuel County Historical Society with the provision that it be used for historical or educational purposes.
_	In 1906 the estate was given to the City of Glasgow by Lord Rowallan, with the provision that it be for the "citizens of Glasgow for all time".
_	This proposal was rejected in favor of the provision that exists today.
_	In early 1990, NBC News management sent her to affiliate WFLA-TV to continue her on-air training, with the provision that they could call on her to report for the network when needed.
_	Sevilla subsequently retired Puerta's number 16 shirt, with the provision that should his son, Aitor Antonio (born 22 October 2007), one day play for the club, he will have the option to bring the number out of retirement.
_	In 1858, following the Extra-Parochial Places Act 1857, it effectively became a civil parish for all purposes, with the provision that it would not form part of any poor law union.
_	The house itself went to Friedsam's close friend, Benjamin Altman of B. Altman and Co., under the provision that it be used for educational purposes.
_	The sale was approved by government oversight with the provision that GD would continue to operate out of Air Force Plant 4 in Fort Worth, Texas.
_	On February 6, Portwood was given a five-year suspended sentence with the provision that all charges would be dropped if she went to and completed rehab.
_	The members decided to disband but keen to perpetuate the name of the club, they withdrew the club's funds from the bank, which were in Silver Rupees, had them melted down and made into a cup which they presented to the Rugby Football Union in England in 1878, with the provision that it should be competed for annually.
_	This was largely done in cooperation with the Portuguese Foreign Office and under Salazar’s direct supervision with the provision that these refugees would not try to get Portuguese citizenship.
_	An important new regulation announced in this document is the provision that all (arch)bishops and Curial officials, from October 11, 1966, were deemed to "voluntarily" offer their resignation to the pope on their 75th birthday.
_	Galloway’s owner, Marsden Milton Hankins allowed the young Galloway to seek brick masonry jobs with the provision that he could bring Hankins fifteen dollars a month.
_	Most of these provisions are covered by the provision that prisoners are under the detaining power's own code of military regulations, with some additional provisions which cover specific prisoner of war issues and some other provisions to protect prisoners of war if the military regulations of the detaining power do not meet a minimum standard.
_	The State Government's plan was rejected by the City of Melbourne, who passed the flyover project on the provision that it would retain the light-rail reservation, at additional State Government expense, whilst also adding to the future cost of the tram link.
_	He appointed his son Vasily Dmitrievich as successor, with the provision that if Vasily were to die as an infant, his brother, Yury Dmitrievich, would be the successor.
_	He persuades the Navy Board to give him a new submarine command with the provision that his executive officer be someone who has just returned from active sea patrol.
_	Early in this century, the city transferred the locomotive to the Fort Smith Trolley Museum with the provision that the museum pay for the moving.
_	Also included and supported by Grant was the provision that the Dominican Republic could apply for statehood.
_	On 19 February 1982, she was exchanged to Farrell Lines, Inc., who immediately sold her to C.W. Enterprise Investments, Inc., with the provision that she be scrapped within 24 months in either South Korea or Taiwan.
_	The United States Congress later amended the Amateur Sports Act to include the provision that the USOC would not recognize any arbitration loser, and the federation was again in arbitration.
_	On 23 January 1821 Pius VII restored the monastery, with the provision that its prelature nullius should belong to the Archbishopric of Modena.
_	Judge Kent submitted his resignation on June 2, 2009, with the provision that it would not take effect for a full year.
_	With the provision that Wyatt's name be removed from the title, and after receiving a $5,000 settlement, the movie was released as "Frontier Marshal".
_	He received most of what he sought, including the provision that the trams would not stop along the margin of his property, and line construction proceeded.
_	The right usually includes the provision that adverse comments or inferences cannot be made by the judge or jury regarding the refusal by a defendant to answer questions before or during a trial, hearing or any other legal proceeding.
_	The Jews had surrendered, and were allowed to remain in Khaybar on the provision that they give half of their annual produce to the Muslims.
_	The legislature made the provision that the site had to be within of the center of county.
_	The content of the treaty included the provision that if one country came under attack, the other would aid and provide military support.
_	Unlike the Aladdin Deck Enhancer, this device was officially approved by Nintendo under the provision that Bandai handle all the hardware manufacturing themselves.
_	The treaty adhered to the provision that "free ships make free goods," allowing neutral nations to trade reciprocally while exempting an agreed upon list of contraband.
_	Later that year, the Supreme Court, in "Oregon v. Mitchell" (1970), struck down the part of the provision lowering the voting age in state elections as unconstitutional; the Court upheld only the part of the provision that lowered the voting age in federal elections.
_	With the provision that Wyatt's name be removed from the title, the movie was released as "Frontier Marshal".
_	This grant was subject to the provision that the status of eligibility be renewed if the treaty hadn't entered into force within four years of the registration.
_	Included in the agreement was the provision that the original 1939 airport terminal building could be relocated for future use.
_	Here he persuaded Pope John VIII to issue a bull known as "Industriae tuae" in June 880, which approved the liturgy to be officiated in Old Church Slavonic in Moravia, although with the provision that the Gospels first be read in Latin.
_	Families rather than individuals were seen as society’s most important political actor, and were therefore afforded special protection, including the provision that married men be granted two votes in local elections, while single men had only one.
_	On 3 October 1837 the title deeds were issued to Mr. Hood with the provision that the land should be used exclusively for the burial of British subjects.
_	However, it is Halachically permitted in the Diaspora to give the separated Challah to a Kohen for consumption, and even encouraged by some Rabbinic authorities, with the provision that the Kohen has immersed in a Mikvah.
_	The members decided to disband but keen to perpetuate the name of the club, they withdrew the club's funds from the bank; which were in Silver Rupees, had them melted down and made into a cup which they presented to the RFU in 1878, with the provision that it should be competed for annually.
_	He inserted the provision that permitted the accused to testify.
_	Smith announced a plan to remove the provision that requires Internet service providers to block access to certain foreign websites.
_	These groups are numbered beginning 100, 110, 120 etc., with some provision of spare numbers for future additions; the official CIPEM numberings used today are based on Ventris and Bennett's numbering, with the provision that three or four letter codes (written in small capitals), based on Latin words that seemed relevant at the time, are used where the meanings are known and agreed.
_	One controversial provision of the bill was the provision that would waive the requirement that schools follow certain nutritional requirements in their school lunches, requirements that first lady Michelle Obama has been a strong supporter of.
_	There are also provisions for moving the intervals and interval lengths in certain situations, most notably the provision that if nine wickets are down, the lunch and tea interval are delayed to the earlier of the fall of the next wicket and 30 minutes elapsing.
_	The school is named after John McGlashan, a significant Presbyterian lawyer, politician, public servant and educationalist, and was founded after his daughters' gift of the family home and estate in 1918 on the provision that a Presbyterian school was established for boys.
_	In 1936 the Academy sold their land and donated the proceeds to the new Dominion Museum and National Art Gallery of New Zealand on the provision that they would be accommodated in the new New Zealand Dominion Museum building on Buckle Street.
_	The Act amended Guam's Organic Act allowing the Guam Legislature to create an appellate court to hear all cases in Guam over which any court established by the Constitution and laws of the United States does not have exclusive jurisdiction, with the provision that for the first 15 years after establishment that of that court, the 9th Circuit Court would still maintain judicial overview in the appeals process.
_	It revoked the provision that bales of wool should be made up of 20 stones, each of 14 pounds, but made no provision for the continued use of the stone.
_	If formula_34 is a sequence of complex numbers rather than a sequence of real numbers, this last formula can still be used to define convergence, with the provision that formula_60 denotes the complex modulus, i.e. formula_61.
_	On June 29, 2006, the city completed the proposed sale, selling 156 Rivington St. to ABC No Rio for $1, still including the provision that the organization must raise the rest of the money to renovate the building.
_	Markandeya submitted that the provision that gave a litigant power to annul the judgment of the tribunal, before which it is a party is in the nature of a "Bill of Attainder" and void, which was accepted by the Supreme Court and clause (5) of Article 371-D was struck down.
_	Bourassa announced that talks could proceed based on the five conditions, adding only the provision that "recognition of Quebec's distinct character" had to be an interpretive clause rather than a symbolic note in a revised preamble.
_	The Weights and Measures Act 1897 made the provision that metric units could be used in addition to the traditional imperial units for purposes of trade.
_	Upon her death in 1930, Mary Foster bequeathed the land and her home to the City and County of Honolulu, with the provision that the city "accept and forever keep and properly maintain the (gardens) as a public and tropical park to be known and called Foster Park".
_	Æthelwulf left a bequest to Æthelbald, Æthelred and Alfred, with the provision that whoever lived the longest was to inherit the whole; this is seen by some historians as leaving the kingship of Wessex to the survivor, but other historians dispute this and it may have been intended to provide for the younger sons.
_	The 1887 meeting resolved that the college not be attached to a religious denomination, and that the Colleges' Endowment Act of 1854, which provided for the establishment of the denominational men's colleges, should be subject to the provision that "no religious catechism or formulary distinctive of any particular denomination" should be taught, nor would any attempt be made to attach students to any particular denomination.
_	Many deeds include the provision that owners must first offer their property back to the association in the event of a sale.
_	Judged from the perspective of that time, Redmond had won a form of triumph: he had secured the passing of Home Rule with the provision that the implementation of the measure would be delayed "not later than the end of the present war", which "would be bloody but short lived".
_	Dr. Hardin gave the MSURRC permission to connect the display track to the siding and move the engine over to a part of the track near the police station, with the provision that the club provide a bond, remove the fence, stairs and all of its belongings from the display site, then tear up the track put down along with the display track.
_	William D. Daniels was awarded the contracts for both bridges with the provision that they must be completed by the end of the year, 1861.
_	The General Assembly enacted legislation on Feb. 28, 1874, directing that an election be held on Apr. 7, 1874, to determine the location of the county seat—but with the provision that the site be located on the Georgia Western Railroad.
_	However, from 1991 until 2015, a grand final replay would still be played after a drawn grand final, with the provision that extra time be played if the replay were drawn, rather than playing a second replay.
_	In 2008, TBS began airing MLB regular season Sunday games, with the provision that no team may appear on the telecasts more than 13 times during the season.
_	After some disagreement with the actor's agents, Heston agreed to briefly appear with the provision that Taylor be killed and that Heston's pay go to charity.
_	Hoffa had been pardoned from prison by President Richard Nixon during 1971, allegedly after the payment of a large bribe from the Mafia, with the provision that he could not engage in union activity.
_	On his deathbed in 1070, Baldwin left Flanders to his eldest son Arnulf and Hainaut to the next oldest son Baldwin with the provision that if either preceded the other in death, he would inherit the other's county as well.
_	He donated his Texas ranch in his will to the public to form the Lyndon B. Johnson National Historical Park, with the provision that the ranch "remain a working ranch and not become a sterile relic of the past".
_	In 2006, 2010, and again in 2011 the U.N. Human Rights Committee, after reviewing petitions from South Korean conscientious objectors, declared that the government was violating Article 18 of the ICCPR, the provision that guarantees the right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion.
_	The Sino-Soviet Treaty of Friendship, Alliance and Mutual Assistance included the provision that each side would protect the other from an attack by "Japan or any state allied with it" and the PRC undoubtedly viewed with alarm Japan's role as the principal US military base during the Korean War.
_	But the most important part of the Act was the provision that a quorum of only one judge was needed to convene a circuit court.
_	The company agreed in March 2013 to pay $2.62 billion for 27.3% of Charter Communications from Apollo Management, Oaktree Capital Management and Crestview Partners with the provision that Liberty would not increase its stake past 35% until after January 2016 but no more than 39.99%.
_	Then, upon analogy to another statutory provision that covers cases similar to the case at hand, this case is resolved upon this provision instead of the provision that applies to it directly.
_	For Tucson, this amount was doubled to US$500 under the provision that English lessons were added to the daily curriculum.
_	In 1935, through an act of Congress, the United States Department of War deeded 185 acres to Los Angeles County with the provision that it be used as a park and recreation center.
_	In 14 volumes, some 3500 pages Presents opinions of scholars of first few generations, and majority opinions of the commentators throughout Muslim history, with the provision that such opinions do not contradict a meaning given out by the majority of the Salaf.
_	Murugan granted this, on the provision that Surapadma would forever be his vahana — whereupon Surapadma assumed the form of a peacock.
_	The institution of the clasp was followed in 1926 with the provision that a rosette may be worn on the ribbon bar to indicate the award of each subsequent clasp.
_	At the cabinet meeting held after the death of King Petar the decision was made to purchase the house in which King Peter “ailed and died” for the National Museum with the provision that "all rooms remain as they are".
_	After the Dodgers ended their affiliation with the Royals, potential new owners of the team had an option on the franchise, with the provision that a suitable ballpark be put in place.
_	The easiest way to visualize a 2-D point pattern is a map of the locations, which is simply a scatterplot but with the provision that the axes are equally scaled.
_	As for the provision that forbade advertising speech so as to convey the impression it depicted minors engaged in sexual conduct, the Court found this provision to be even more sweeping.
_	Other changes agreed upon in the talks between ZANU-PF and the MDC included the posting of results outside of polling stations and the provision that, if state television aired any candidate's advertising, then it had to also air advertising from other candidates.
_	However, the judge takes into account Joanne's depression and the loving relationship she had with Alice, and gives her a five-year suspended sentence on the provision that Joanne cuts all ties with Alice.
_	The court found the searches to violate the provision that prohibits unreasonable searches in the Fourth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.
_	Sam Houston agreed, with the provision that the operation be held under the strictest secrecy.
_	This had already been contested before courts by the "Žemaitē bova, īr ė būs" ("Samogitians were, are and will be") Association, also named" Žemaitiu soeiga", which considers that it is a violation of the Constitution, more particularly of the provision that everyone has the right to decide on his nationality.
_	In instances where the state of the creditor’s last known address did not provide for escheat by the state, the Court declared that intangible personal property was “subject to the right of the State of the last known address to recover it if and when its law made provision for escheat of such property,” with the provision that the state could retain “the property for itself only until some other State comes forward with proof that it has a superior right to escheat.
_	It was then approved on the provision that the armour would be thickened from 30 to 40 mm, according to the new specifications.
_	In April 1814, the New York legislature voted to transfer the land to Columbia College, with the provision that the college would be moved to the site, although Columbia successfully lobbied for the removal of that condition in 1819.
_	Later she relents and gives the rest of the money to Walter to invest with the provision that he reserve $3,000 for Beneatha's education.
_	Senator Ron Wyden was one of the representatives who requested that Congress remove the provision that requires the involvement of the Department of Justice in intellectual property enforcement.
_	As part of this law, the provision that required surface operations to be sold was removed.
_	Ammons's contract included the provision that it renewed on a daily basis (essentially making him "president for life"), and guaranteed an annual "performance bonus" of 25 to 35 percent of his $325,000 base salary.
_	The 1963 Constitution of Malaysia retains the provision that each state sends two senators, but subsequent amendments gradually increased the number of appointed members to 40 (plus another 4 appointed for representing the federal territories), leaving state-elected members in the minority and effectively diminishing the states' representation in Dewan Negara.
_	Crichton would only agree to this on the provision that he be able to direct.
_	It had been willed by Borja's mother, with the provision that it be used as a library and cultural center.
_	Upon Perkins' death, his family gave the land to the City of Colorado Springs in 1909, with the provision that it would be a free public park.
_	The Rev. Samuel Provoost was appointed Rector of Trinity (1784–1800) in 1784, and the New York State Legislature ratified the charter of Trinity Church, deleting the provision that asserted its loyalty to the King of England.
_	Fatty ended up re-signing with Manly for more than his previous contract (on the provision that he used at least half of the money to buy a house in the area...another Arthurson incentive to remain at the club), but far less than what Gibson was offering.
_	This section of the Penal Code has caused problems for Ahmadis, particularly the provision that forbids them from "directly or indirectly" posing as Muslims.
_	Regarding the appropriate punishment, the magistrate applied the provision that a contravention of section 1(1) could attract the same penalty as that which might be imposed for the unlawful act itself.
_	On January 15, in order to avoid this process, the CBA was revised to allow teams to use one of their two compliance buyouts prior to the start of the shortened 2012–13 season, with the provision that the players bought-out in such a way would still be paid their prorated but otherwise full 2012–13 salaries (which would still count against the 2012–13 cap), and with the buyout of the subsequent years otherwise proceeding as originally intended.
_	Hitler's will, dated 2 May 1938 (which left his entire fortune to the party) included the provision that it be opened in Schwarz's presence.
_	In January 1807, while one of the five seats was vacant, the General Assembly reduced the number to four with the provision that it be further reduced to three upon the next vacancy.
_	Hamilton Garrideb bequeathed his $15 million estate to John Garrideb on the provision that he find two more Garridebs to share it with equally.
_	Regarding the appropriate punishment, the magistrate applied the provision that such a contravention could attract the same penalty as that which might be imposed for the unlawful act itself.
_	According to one story, Bobby Byrd's family helped to secure an early release, while another version of events had Brown getting parole after S. C. Lawson, the owner of a car and motor manufacturing company, agreed to sponsor him, with the provision that Brown promise to pursue a two-year job commitment.
_	The SE must have a minimum subscribed capital of €120,000 as per article 4(2) of the directive, subject to the provision that where a member state requires a larger capital for companies exercising certain types of activities, the same requirement will also apply to an SE with its registered office in that member state (article 4(3)).
_	He was forced to sell his ranch in 1919 to an oilman friend, W. J. McAlister, with the provision that Goodnight and his then first wife could stay in the home until they both died.
_	He rejected only the provision that authorized noblemen who died without a son to freely bequeath their estates.
_	In its majority decision, the Court struck down the provision of the federal sentencing statute that required federal district judges to impose a sentence within the Federal Guidelines range, along with the provision that deprived federal appeals courts of the power to review sentences imposed outside the range.
_	The agreement, reached on 2 March 1967, allowed 15 B-52s and their support personnel to be based at U-Tapao, with the provision that missions flown from Thailand would not over fly Laos or Cambodia on their way to targets in Vietnam.
_	After blatant interference with the mission of the Kree soldier Mar-Vell, Uatu is put on trial by his own race, but is released on the provision that he never directly interfere again.
_	He filed a motion of appeal on June 23, 2011, under the provision that the court failed to consider sentencing guidelines.
_	The bill has the provision that any misuse of data will carry a punishment of up to three years imprisonment and also fine.
_	Then in 1850, came the history making sale, when Vaca sold one square league (about 9 square miles) of land to William McDaniel with the provision that one square mile (640 acres) would be used to create a township called Vacaville.
_	This caused Gritchenko to bequeath a collection of seventy works including oils, watercolors and drawings, to the Alexis Gritchenko Foundation, with the provision that they be transferred some day to the museums of a free Ukraine.
_	The Army fliers had a series of crashes, and it was decided to privatize the delivery with the provision that no former companies could bid on the contracts.
_	The Paola Town Company later gave the square to the City of Paola, with the provision that no building be built on it.
_	Some rights activists have expressed their discontent with the provision that a person must be fully operated to receive a marriage license.
_	However, as the law covers primarily the digital media sector, the provision that would limit simultaneous ownership over two or more print media has never been introduced in legislation.
_	The abbey church was converted to the large parish church for Tjæreby and Alsønderup Parishes, while the conventual and service buildings were granted as a fief to Christoffer Trundsen in 1544, with the provision that he should maintain the last remaining canons under Abbot Anders Ibsen.
_	In the late 1990s the county leased the debt-stricken airport to the bi-state Delaware River and Bay Authority (DRBA), operators of the Delaware Memorial Bridge, on a thirty-year lease with the provision that the DRBA may seek up to two additional thirty-year leases.
_	NATO offered immediate negotiations with the goal to ban nuclear armed middle-range missiles from Europe completely, with the provision that the same missiles could be installed four years later if negotiations failed.
_	In 1963, Pakistan entered into a treaty with China to transfer part of the Gilgit Agency to China, (Shaksgam Valley - the Trans-Karakoram Tract), with the provision that the settlement was subject to the final solution of the Kashmir dispute.
_	However he struck down the provision that only seven rounds of ammunition could be loaded into a ten-round magazine, calling it "an arbitrary restriction" that violated the Second Amendment, and saying that it could result in "pitting the criminal with a loaded magazine against the law-abiding citizen limited to seven rounds."
_	Some doctors may recommend a continuance of caffeine consumption but with the provision that the patient actively takes note of physiological changes that happen after caffeine intake.
_	They also viewed the provision that employers are obligated to address grievances in a timely manner at the workplace as problematic because of potentially uncooperative employees.
_	The treaty assured rule over the vast lands given by treaty to the Kiowa, but white settlers continued to pour across Kiowa lands, and tribesmen, unhappy with the provision that reduced their domain to a small reservation, continued to raid settlements and harass immigrants.
_	It is awarded each year by the Prešeren Fund () to two eminent Slovene artists, with the provision that their work was presented to the public at least two years ago.
_	It was not until 1877 () that the Bureau of Engraving and Printing was given funding for labor, paper, transportation, and other expenses with the provision that all work be conducted on site, and for a price commensurate with that of the private bank note companies.
_	The club sold davits to help pay for the construction of the club, with the provision that the club could buy the davit back if the owner left the club.
_	However traffic on that segment never materialized, and after about 10 years of dormancy, the Gilkey-Spindale section was converted into a rail-trail with the provision that it could be reactivated if needed.
_	Marx's concept corresponds roughly with the concept of value added in national accounts, with some important differences (see below) and with the provision that it applies only to the net output of "capitalist" production, not to the valuation of "all" production in a society, part of which may of course not be commercial production at all.
_	The Sino-Soviet Treaty of Friendship, Alliance, and Mutual Assistance included the provision that each side would protect the other from an attack by "Japan or any state allied with it", and China undoubtedly viewed with alarm Japan's role as the principal United States base during the Korean War.
_	This limited the length of service of a pressed man to five years, and added the provision that a man could not be pressed twice.
_	Fenton and the government split the proceeds of the auction, with the provision that any further 1933 double eagles would be seized and not auctioned.
_	Boone County officials offered a suitable site on the provision that Kenton County paid the acquisition cost.
_	The Law on the Referendum on Self-determination of Catalonia contained the provision that, in case of an outcome in favour of independence, independence was to be declared within 48 hours after all votes were counted.
_	Although the United States had agreed to respect the Accords, it would not sign them because the US government disagreed with the provision that split Vietnam at the 17th parallel.
_	The race was for two and three-year-olds with the provision that the winner would be available for sale at a price of 350 guineas.
_	William Bradford, Allerton and others took on the colony's debt to the Merchant Adventurers with the provision that they be given a monopoly in the fur trade.
_	In 2007, the treaty was superseded by a new Friendship Treaty that replaced the provision that made it mandatory for Bhutan to take India's guidance on foreign policy, provided broader sovereignty but also stated in its Article 2:
_	German president Theodor Heuss, upon request from chancellor Konrad Adenauer, declared the "Lied der Deutschen" the national anthem of the German Federal Republic in May 1952, along with the provision that only the third verse was to be sung at official occasions.
_	As a result, the "Lied" (implicitly in its entirety) was declared the national anthem, with the provision that the third verse would have precedence.
_	According to conspiracy theorists, to mask the nature of the project the site was closed in 1969 and donated as a wildlife refuge/park, with the provision that everything underground would remain the property of the Air Force (although, in reality, the base remained in operation until the 1980s).
_	It would seem that this provision was removed in favour of the provision that allowed the attestation of constables just for the purposes of enforcing the Act itself and the byelaws made there under.
_	Dag Tuastad, senior lecturer of Middle East and Africa at the University of Oslo, claims that Kaplan, '"like Huntington (author of "Clash of Civilizations"), perpetuates a neo-Orientalist sentiment, namely, emphasizing "features innately embedded in the Muslim religion, including the provision that Islam is a religion of the sword and a religion that glorifies military virtues".
_	Ramon Berenguer IV died on 19 August 1245 at Aix-en-Provence, and according to his will, Beatrice became Countess of Provence and Forcalquier in her own right, with the provision that the Dowager Countess could retain the usufruct of the County of Provence for her lifetime.
_	The English Bill of Rights 1688 was retained but partly repealed, including the provision that guaranteed the right to bear arms to Protestants.
_	Stevenson sold the property, located on Little Lake Street between School and Howard Streets, for one dollar, with the provision that it be used for affordable housing for artists.
_	For now let us refer to these single-particle stationary states as "orbitals" (to avoid confusing these "states" with the total many-body state), with the provision that each possible internal particle property (spin or polarization) counts as a separate orbital.
_	The fine was in lieu of a jail sentence, with the provision that she not use intoxicants or attend night spots for two years.
_	They found that the network was receptive, and sent them back with a commitment to a first season, with the provision that a second experienced producer, (which ended up being Michael Volpe) be brought on board to assist the team.
_	Article 4(2) of the Order 1986 gave the provision that adults and minors who had a connection to Hong Kong were entitled to register as British Nationals (Overseas).
_	The government sent the National Assembly Election Ordinance to the President on 23 October 2017 with the provision that the upper house be elected using Single Transferable Voting System.
_	Melish, through political influence, was able to retain the provision that they should be struck "at the mints", allowing coinage at all three mints.
_	But thanks to the accumulated debt burden, by the 1980s the economy could not attract foreign capital, and virtually all international funds made available to Somalia in rescheduling agreements came with the provision that international civil servants would monitor all expenditures.
_	After another successful series of friendlies against Irish teams, Dundalk FC and St. Patrick's Athletic, Derry were informed that they would be accepted into the newly formed First Division, on the provision that the Irish League did not object, and FIFA would sanction such a move.
_	He acquired adaptation, recording, and publishing rights for the mere nominal, but formal, consideration of one dollar, subject to the provision that the melody's composers would retain their original share of royalty rights with respect to whatever versions
_	Champion agreed, with the provision that it open in Los Angeles at the Ahmanson Theatre.
_	Germans of all political shades denounced the treaty—particularly the provision that blamed Germany for starting the war—as an insult to the nation's honor.
_	A major change was the provision that some clear channels were allocated to be used simultaneously by two stations — those maintaining sole use of a frequency were classified as Class I-A, while stations sharing a clear channel were known as Class I-B.
_	In my view the provision that nothing in Section 2 of the 1989 Act is to affect the creation or operation of resulting, implied or constructive trusts effectively excludes from the operation of the section cases in which an interest in land might equally well be claimed by relying on constructive trust or proprietary estoppel.
_	To implement her plan to establish a cultural center in Fitchburg, Norcross shipped works of art from her collection to her hometown and left $10,000 or $100,000 in her will, with the provision that the town raise an equal amount to provide a healthy endowment, otherwise the monies would go to Wheaton Seminary.
_	The International Radio Conference of Atlantic City reduced the allocation to 1800–2000 kHz under the provision that amateurs must not interfere with LORAN operation.
_	It also added the provision that the question of a general revision of the constitution be submitted at the general election every 16 years.
_	Tom Flanagan states that an amendment of the North-West Territories Act (which dropped the provision that trials with crimes punishable by death should be tried in Manitoba) meant that the trial could be convened within the North-West Territories and did not have to be held in Winnipeg.
_	Nothing further happened until 1855, when the Legislature revisited the subject and modified the Organic Act to include the provision that "there shall always be one Professor of Homœopathy in the Department of Medicine."
_	The dispute was quickly resolved and the film title remained unchanged on the provision that the film would include trailers in its cinema releases for the then-upcoming James Bond film, "Die Another Day", and "".
_	In 1983, Elliott walked into Broderbund Software in San Rafael, California, with a sketchpad full of game designs and was hired on the provision that he could convince a programmer to take on one of his designs.
_	In his will, Rossini left virtually his entire estate to Pesaro, his native city, for the establishment of a free music school there with the provision that the legacy would only come to the city upon the death of his widow, Olympe Pélissier.
_	Later in 1909, the Department of Militia and Defence later transferred the property to the City of Toronto with the provision that the city would preserve the Fort's historic structures.
_	Education is also the provision that most notably takes advantage of the act.
_	Ball opted to continue on television under the provision that her two children, Lucie Arnaz and Desi Arnaz Jr., agreed to appear alongside her.
_	In 1933, when Stein traveled throughout the U.S. on a book publicity tour, she eagerly agreed to speak at Iowa City (on the second floor of what is now the Prairie Lights Bookstore), with the provision that she would be able to fly over Independence, to see Cook’s birthplace from the air.
_	The commission decided to retain Siebert until his contract expires June 27, 2007, with the provision that he pay for outside review of his future work (a QA program).
_	Legislation enacted during his term made legal the provision that widows were entitled to a third of their husband's possessions at the time of his death.
_	On October 30, 1906, he was given the property deed in Red Bluff, California with the provision that it remain as a hospital for the Sisters of Mercy.
_	It included the provision that they emancipate the slaves and provide those who wanted to stay in the Chickasaw Nation with full citizenship; they and their descendants became known as the Chickasaw Freedmen.
_	The landowner donated land for a Louisville and Nashville Railroad station in 1858 on the provision that it be named after nearby Horse Cave.
_	Universal Sports offered carriage on broadcast stations on a channel lease basis until 2011, with the provision that the stations strike deals with cable providers in their markets to carry the network by January 31, 2009.
_	These grants were awarded on the provision that TUNE!
_	By his Will of 1601, Leonard Smith, a fishmonger of London, left £120 and all his goods to establish a fellowship at Sidney Sussex College, Cambridge and in 1604 'Mr Smith's Fellowship' was confirmed by the college, with the provision that "scholars from the Grammar School of Holt, in Norfolk" were to have preference.
_	Andrea Reres, a descendant of Demetrio, founded the Basilian Monstery in Mezzojuso with the provision that the Greek rite would be used.
_	One of those classmates, Dylan, invites Mandy to a pool party at his house and she accepts with the provision that her best friend, Emmet (Michael Welch) can come along with her.
_	In Colombo, the Ceylonese Prime Minister S. W. R. D. Bandaranaike, through not objecting to the ADF in principle, told Kishi that he preferred bilateral aid deals as it allowed Ceylon to play off the Soviet Union against the United States, and objected to the provision that joining the ADF would mean be "locked in" to only accepting aid from the ADF.
_	Consequentially, destructive as well as non-destructive scientific methods can be carried out with the provision that an excavation is seen as an "ultima ratio" to gain knowledge about the archaeological heritage of Europe.
_	On 15 October 1946 he was sentenced to death by hanging, with the provision that if he were later found alive, any new facts brought to light at that time could be taken into consideration to reduce the sentence or overturn it.
_	The song was published by Boosey & Co. in 1914, once more with the provision that while the music could be performed publicly without charge or copyright infringement, all public parodies of the song were strictly forbidden.
_	Before his death, Baldwin VI left Flanders to their eldest son, Arnulf III, and Hainaut to their younger son, Baldwin II, with the provision that if either son preceded the other in death, he would inherit the other's county as well.
_	The bill passed, but the provision that Minnesota or Wisconsin would have to cede sovereignty over the site created an unacceptable situation for both states.
_	"We see it this way: in September we should bring the country's main law into line with the provision that currently corresponds to our society".
_	Article 10. The Agent of the United States residing among the Cherokees to have a sufficient piece of ground allotted "for his temporary use" and the provision that this treaty was to "be carried into effect on both sides with all good faith."
_	He had offered some of his land to the Grand Trunk Pacific Railway Company in 1911 for a townsite, on the provision that he be permitted to give it a name.
_	The windows are one of the oldest war memorials in England, second in date to All Souls College, Oxford, founded in 1438 with the provision that its fellows should pray for those killed in the French wars.
_	In the Russian Federation, the provision that the head of state addresses the highest legislative body first appeared in the Law of the RSFSR of 24 April 1991 "On the President of the RSFSR," under paragraph 3 of Article 5 of which the President "... shall at least once a year deliver a report to the Congress of People's Deputies on the implementation of socio-economic and other programs adopted by the Congress of People's Deputies of the RSFSR and the Supreme Soviet of the RSFSR, on the situation in the RSFSR, give messages to the people of the RSFSR, the Congress of People's Deputies of the RSFSR, and Supreme Soviet of the RSFSR.
_	Turkey's constitutional court decided in 2016 to annul the provision that punishes all sexual acts against children under the age of 15 as sexual abuse, according to opposition media.
_	At the end of the conference Ramsay MacDonald undertook to produce a Communal Award for minority representation, with the provision that any free agreement between the parties could be substituted for his award.
_	However, in the interceding time, the Constitution of Iowa came into effect, including the provision that "future laws altering county boundaries should be submitted to a vote of the people of the counties concerned and must be approved by them before going into effect".
_	In practice, so much power was concentrated in the president's hands that when the Second Empire was proclaimed, the only substantive changes were the replacement of the word "president" with the word "emperor," and the provision that the emperor's post was hereditary.
_	Sutter agreed, but with the provision that the letter also include his feelings towards Hunt and the I.W.W. issue.
_	Franken favors transitioning to a universal health care system, with the provision that every child in America should receive health care coverage immediately.
_	""Also, the provision that in making the temporary appointments as ensigns the maximum age limit shall be 50 years for commissioned warrant officers and warrant officers has prevented such appointments in the cases of a number of very deserving officers of those classes, and it is hoped that this restriction will be removed.""
_	On May 6, 1972, Ahidjo announces his decision to convert the Federal Republic into a unitary state, on the provision that the idea was supported via referendum.
_	After Robert Toy died in 1556, most of his property passed to Toy's stepmother Elizabeth Toy with the provision that it would pass to Humphrey after her death.
_	Sutter agreed, but with the provision that the letter also include his feelings towards Hunt, which were not favorable.
_	During the 2015 congressional effort to partially repeal the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA), MacDonough ruled the provision that would roll back the Independent Payment Advisory Board disqualified the 2015 package from consideration as a reconciliation bill in the Senate under the Byrd Rule, which requires that reconciliation bills must have a budgetary effect.
_	Frank Kush, then the football head coach at Arizona State University, helped convince Bobby Winkles, the school's baseball coach, to sign White to a scholarship with the provision that he would also play punter for the football team.
_	After Cubish's death soon afterward ("died laughing", reports one newspaper), Daffy inherits the Cubish fortune...locked in a safe...under the provision that he will use the money to provide a service to the community and follow Cubish's creed to display honesty in business affairs.
_	Sigismund assented to the offer, with the provision that Prussia should be treated as a Polish fiefdom; and after this arrangement had been confirmed by a treaty concluded at Kraków, Albert pledged a personal oath to Sigismund I and was invested with the duchy for himself and his heirs on 10 February 1525.
_	Judging by the provision that the Romans and Latins were to share booty on an equal basis, it is likely that the treaty required the Latins to contribute roughly the same number of troops to joint operations as Rome.
_	Revisions include the restriction of placing feet or "any object that may soil" on seats, the prohibition of using offensive language (including the user-generated displays at Pioneer Village station, which is an art display called "LightSpell"), and the provision that one must give up their seat to a person with a disability in priority seating areas.
_	In 1994, Onondaga County, New York purchased the former Delaware, Lackawanna and Western Railroad (DL&W) line into Syracuse, with the provision that the NYS&W operate RDC service in Syracuse between Syracuse University, Armory Square, and the Carousel Mall with the option for further routes, leading to the creation of OnTrack.
_	I of Castile, Charles also made the provision that John should enter the clergy and pursue an ecclesiastical career.
_	Ward died, leaving his timberlands to his six children with the provision that for 12 years after his death, his son Willis C. Ward, his grandson Franklin B. Ward and his son-law George K.
_	Nikah Misyar () is a type of Nikah (marriage) in Sunni Islam only carried out through the normal contractual procedure, with the provision that the husband and wife give up several rights by their own free will, such as living together, equal division of nights between wives in cases of polygamy, the wife's rights to housing, and maintenance money (""nafaqa""), and the husband's right of homekeeping and access.
_	In June 1730 the Head Chief of the Tunica, "Cahura-Joligo", agreed to let a small party of Natchez refugees settle near his village, with the provision that they should do so unarmed.
_	The Court had to decide whether subsection (b)(2), the provision that allowed the district court to impose the 85-month sentence in this case, was a separate crime or merely a penalty provision.
_	In his will of 1533, John Levett left his iron mills and furnaces to his brother, with the provision that his children be cared for with the proceeds.
_	D.C., Virginia, and Maryland-based charities can offer raffles, with the provision that these drawings are held in the District of Columbia.
_	For example, the Historic Buildings and Ancient Monuments Act 1953 contained the provision that "For the purposes of this Act the administrative county of Monmouth shall be taken to be part of Wales and not part of England."
_	In dealing with the provision that a teacher had to be found unfit before public homosexual conduct can be a basis for termination, it noted that "many adverse effects are not material and substantial disruptions.
_	The awarding of doctoral degrees had originally been exclusive to the UC system, with the provision that the California State Universities could offer PhD degrees as "joint" degrees in combination with the University of California or an accredited private university.
_	In order to earn money to attend Tufts College near Boston, Power arranged with the local high school to teach a year-long evening radio course, with the provision that he would not be paid unless at least one of his students went on to qualify as a commercial operator.
_	Later in 1949, title to the then ranch and horses was passed to the State of California, with the provision that the herd of Arabian horses must be maintained.
_	The Council's mandate included the provision that all executive bureaus (except Public Instruction) be headed by Filipinos and that these agencies assist the Philippine Legislature in creating laws.
_	An uneasy peace was agreed, which included the provision that Prince Christian of Schleswig-Holstein-Sonderburg-Glücksburg would be Frederick's heir in all his dominions and the prior claims of others (who included Christian's own mother-in-law, brother-in-law and wife) were surrendered.
_	On April 20, 2012, Governor Rick Scott signed into law Alexander's budget for the State University System, including the provision that created Florida Polytechnic University as an independent institution, and closed down USF Polytechnic.
_	Flagg offers Bateman his freedom on the provision that he proceeds to "get down on [his] knees and beg for it."
_	1896-1910: Porterville High School was supported by the Porterville district of the elementary school system of the county, with the provision that students coming from outside that district may be charged a tuition fee.
_	Having worked with the Horace Greeley Union Colony, he founded the town in a similar way, including the provision that no liquor be sold or manufactured in the town.
_	The amendment would delete the provision that allows colleges to give preferential treatment to people based on race, sex, color, ethnicity, or national origin.
_	In 1683, Edward Benn and his heirs were given land with the provision that they rebuild the stone bridge and maintain it for ever.
_	At the age of 15, he spent the summer training with Everton F.C. during their US tour in 2006 on the recommendation of US international Tim Howard and was invited to Finch Farm before being offered a professional contract on the provision that he could secure an EU passport due to his Greek heritage.
_	Marques brought no money to the team and was employed under the provision that another driver with more sponsorship money could replace him at any point in the season, and that prospect was realised towards the end of the year, when Minardi replaced Marques with Alex Yoong with three races remaining.
_	Article 29, repeated as article 33, contains the provision that no member of the National Transitional Council may nominate a candidate or themselves assume the position of President of the state, of a member of the legislative council, or of a ministerial portfolio.
_	The church, old school and care-taker's home were all sold to the Metropolitan Hotel in 1971 with the provision that the congregation could use the church for another 5 years.
_	However, the fraternity’s rapid growth allowed it to stand on its own as a separate and co-equal fraternity, and in 1921 it dropped the provision that allowed men of other fraternities to join.
_	As regards legal proceedings, the chief amendments of the act of 1872 are: the extension of the provision that the " owner, agent, "Adminis-" or manager " charged in respect of any contravention.
_	According to the preamble, the protocol is intended to achieve the purposes of certain articles in the Convention on the Rights of the Child, where the rights are defined with the provision that parties should take "appropriate measures" to protect them.
_	Elected as a delegate to the Virginia Constitutional Convention of 1829–1830, John Marshall advanced his view that the electorate should be expanded in Virginia by the provision that any white male who had served in the War of 1812 or who would serve in the militia in the future defense of the country deserved the right to vote.
_	Upon the death of Henry Cushman, Cushman Hall was willed to the town, with the provision that income from its use go toward a park on the adjacent land.
_	Szold begged the school's president, Solomon Schechter, to allow her to study, he did only with the provision that she not seek ordination.
_	The Duke of Gloucester was strongly against the match, however, and the Parliament of 1427–8 passed a bill which set forth the provision that if the queen dowager remarried without the king's consent, her husband would forfeit his lands and possessions, although any children of the marriage would not suffer punishment.
_	Only officially registered parties were eligible to compete, and registered parties could not form a bloc in order to improve their chances of clearing the 7.0 percent threshold, with the provision that parties in the Duma had to represent at least 60% of the participating citizens, and that there must be at least two parties in the Duma.
_	The life of the Assembly, consisting of 250 members, was to be five years unless dissolved sooner; while the Council, with a membership of not less than 63 and not more than 65, was made a permanent body and not subject to dissolution with the provision that one-third of the members should retire every three years.
_	Armijo approved the grant on January 4, 1841 with the provision that the land be settled within two years.
_	On August 27, 2005 at WrestleReunion in Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, Zbyszko faced Diamond Dallas Page, with the provision that he would receive five minutes alone in the ring with the sixty-nine-year-old Bruno Sammartino if he won.
_	Gage and Tollner retired in 1911 and sold the restaurant to A.H. Cunningham and Alexander Ingalls, with the provision that neither the interior nor the name be changed.
_	NBC granted him his release as well, under the provision that he continue to play Brody for a few episodes into the third season so his character could be killed off for dramatic impact.
_	Mr. Kent offered the town $35,000 to build the new library, under the provision that he could dedicate it in the name of his parents.
_	The preparatory work was legitimately invoked by the Commission to show that the provision that "Every shall be free to leave any country, including his own", does not entitle a convicted prisoner to leave the country in which he is lawfully detained.
_	Specific time limits are mentioned for different kinds of information, but there is also the provision that information that still needs to be classified can stay classified.
_	Although he lacked a partner, Raw general manager Kurt Angle still allowed Strowman to wrestle for the titles, under the provision that he reveal his mystery partner at the event.
_	Congress granted approval by an act on March 3, 1817 that allowed them to buy four townships in the Alabama Territory at $2 per acre, with the provision that they cultivate grape vines and olive trees.
_	Bonfils Stanton willed approximately half of her $13 million estate – including the mansion and the surrounding – to Stanton, with the provision that it be transferred to the Roman Catholic Archdiocese of Denver if he remarried.
_	Johnson willed Death Valley Ranch to a religious organization, with the provision that Scotty could live there as long as he wished.
_	Aquino vetoed 13 items, including the provision that Congress should authorize borrowings in excess of the debt ceiling and legislative consultation during budget execution and project implementation.
_	In 1866, the Massachusetts Legislature was asked to allocate $2,000 to the organization which was granted with the provision that the community in Springfield provide a match of funds through private donations.
_	In March 1906, the Utah Fire Proofing Company began work on the Boise River Diversion Dam with the provision that the structure would be completed within one year.
_	Morgan, as she was rescued with the provision that she was not to be displayed to the public and that she would be released back into the wild when she had recovered.
_	However, the building was two years later, on 10 June, purchased by the provincial Crown for $1, with the provision that the house be used as a residence for the viceroy "and for no other purpose," as written by John A. Macdonald at the bottom of the Order in Council transferring the house.
_	Left unchanged was the provision that, after such determination is made, it is subject to appeal in federal courts, including a review of whether the evidence warrants the determination.
_	Texas-Mexico treaty options under consideration included an autonomous Texas within Mexico's borders, or an independent republic with the provision that Texas should emancipate its slaves upon recognition.
_	The German Federal Ministry of Education and Research granted permission to build the facility on 5 June 2007 at a cost of €850 million, under the provision that it should be financed as a European project.
_	When in December 1978 there was media speculation that Prince Charles might marry a Roman Catholic, Powell defended the provision that excludes Roman Catholics from ascending the throne, claiming his objection was not rooted in religious bigotry but in political considerations.
_	As indicated in the 1987 Constitution (Article II, Section 16) there exists legal basis for environmental protection with the provision that:
_	In Gwenpool's first Christmas special Howard the Duck invited her to She-Hulk's Christmas party on the provision that she has not killed any good guys recently.
_	On May 23, 1967, the new bone marrow transplant protocol was approved with the provision that the experiments solely focus on the “therapeutic efficacy of whole body irradiation.”
_	The treaty adhered to the provision that "free ships make free goods," allowing neutral nations to trade reciprocally while exempting an agreed upon list of contraband.
_	In 1921, eight other Cincinnati shoe manufacturers consolidated to form the United States Shoe Corporation—which had Red Cross Shoes as its flagship brand—but by 1929 the combine was failing, and Joseph Stern, head of Stern-Auer, proposed to merge the two companies with the provision that Stern take over marketing for Red Cross Shoes.
_	The bill passed by the house deleted the provision that gave presiding officers the power to act against ministers and MPs, even before trial, but the exemption time of former MPs was increased from five to seven years.
_	The town is built on land given to the Adair family by King Charles 1 in 1626, on the provision that the town holds two annual fairs and a free Saturday market in perpetuity.
_	Li agreed, but under the provision that Liu send troops to Hedong so that the Hedong and Lulong troops could jointly attack Zhaoyi Circuit (昭義, headquartered in modern Changzhi, Shanxi), which had fallen under Zhu's control at that time, to try to relieve the pressure on Yichang.
_	Since Campbell and Mike Viti of the Buffalo Bills were under contract, they were tentatively authorized to play with their respective teams with the provision that if cut, they would have to return to their active duty station and not be able to sign with another team.
_	The ANC agreed to endorse the team on the provision that the flag not be used.
_	Despite the ruling, FIFA appealed to the club, Rafinha and Diego was released for the games under the provision that their salaries was paid for by the Brazilian Football Confederation.
_	Taylor had been given a $1 million interest-free, 25-year loan by the Generals' owner Donald Trump on December 14, 1983, with the provision that he would begin playing in the USFL in 1988.
_	This agreement brought the island under the British Law, with the provision that it would take into account Malay customs, traditions and religion.
_	It was founded in 1438 with the provision that its fellows should pray for those killed in the long wars with France.
_	Mr. Hogan made a deal with Mr. Taub to swap his 40 acres to Taub for his 28 acres with the provision that Captain Parker would dredge a channel between the two properties giving Taub access to Clear Lake.
_	Examples of "kapu" included the provision that men and women could not eat together (Aikapu religion).
_	Among the terms were the provision that Princess Isabella would marry the grandson of Afonso V, Afonso, who was five years younger than the princess.
_	This legal status allows them to own property, administer works of social good and also conduct for-profit businesses with the provision that the profits are used for the social good.
_	The rights of livestock and animals upon man: these are that he spend on them the provision that their kinds require, even if they have aged or sickened such that no benefit comes from them; that he not burden them beyond what they can bear; that he not put them together with anything by which they would be injured, whether of their own kind or other species, and whether by breaking their bones or butting or wounding; that he slaughters them with kindness when he slaughters them, and neither flay their skins nor break their bones until their bodies have become cold and their lives have passed away; that he not slaughter their young within their sight, but that he isolate them; that he makes comfortable their resting places and watering places; that he puts their males and females together during their mating seasons; that he not discard those which he takes as game; and neither shoots them with anything that breaks their bones nor brings about their destruction by any means that renders their meat unlawful to eat.
_	The relation between the mental and the microphysical is material constitution, with the provision that this relation is not to be explicated by the notion of identity.
_	In an agreement with the Rox, Little permitted the dolls to be sold with the provision that the money raised from the sale would go "to the Professional Baseball Scouting Foundation, which provides relief to retired scouts in financial peril".
_	The rest he left to Edith as a life estate with the provision that at her death, his daughters would divide the estate among themselves.
_	She stayed there under the provision that she did not share information about Forbidden City.
_	The term 'Brown Bailout' refers to the provision that UPS has lobbied to have put into the $34.5 billion Federal Aviation Administration Reauthorization Act (H.R. 915) voted on by the United States House of Representatives in May 2009 and by the United States Senate in March 2010.
_	Charles Hunter officially relinquished the land to the town upon his death in January 1961, with the provision that it be passed down to his wife, Leila, for the remainder of her life.
_	However, they were able to include the provision that the two-thirds of the seats would come from the old core of Schwyz.
_	On February 6, Portwood was given a five-year suspended sentence with the provision that all charges would be dropped if she went to and completed rehab.
_	VII restored it as a monastery on 23 January 1821, with the provision that the prelature nullius attached to it should belong to the Archbishop of Modena, into which the exempt territory was finally absorbed in 1986 to form the Diocese of Modena-Nonantola.
_	On January 15, in order to avoid this process, the CBA was revised to allow teams to use one of their two compliance buyouts prior to the start of the shortened 2013 season, with the provision that the players bought out in such a way would still be paid their pro-rated but otherwise full 2012–13 salaries (which would still count against the 2012–13 cap), and with the buyout of the subsequent years otherwise proceeding as originally intended.
_	Furthermore, the provision that allows fire police to use their police power in non-emergency events was later amended to authorize these officers to provide police services for organizations other than volunteer fire companies if requested to do so by their respective municipality.
_	After the count's wife dies, he sends his daughter to a nunnery run by her Reverend aunt, Lady Abbess, but with the provision that she will decide for herself whether she wants to become a nun when she turns thirteen.
_	Unusual among state laws regarding cyberbullying is a provision that withholds funding for schools who are not in compliance with the provision that they must inform parents of those involved in cyberbullying—both the bully and the target.:)
_	Generals owner Donald Trump had given Taylor a $1 million interest-free, 25-year loan on December 14, 1983, with the provision that he would begin playing in the USFL in 1988.
_	In general discourse, the Eighth Amendment has become synonymous with Article 58 2(b), which in turn is considered to be the provision that introduced the presidential power to dissolve the National Assembly.
_	This was largely done in cooperation with the Portuguese Foreign Office and under Salazar’s direct supervision with the provision that these refugees would not try to get Portuguese citizenship.
_	Such provisions include the provision that, before the tenant takes occupation, there must be a joint inspection of the leased premises for defects and the right to privacy.
_	He paid the amount but had to accept the provision that the sale is not closed until the court issues its final ruling on the matter.
_	Although he had been reinstated to his old squadron with the provision that he was to fly only five missions, on 31 July 1944, he took off in an unarmed P-38 on his ninth reconnaissance mission from an airbase on Corsica.
_	On 27 June 1935 the commission approved the type on the provision that the necessary changes would be made.
_	In 1948, Mayor Dennis J. Roberts signed a deed to give the building to the Rhode Island School of Design, with the provision that the exterior of the building be maintained.
_	(He further claimed it was provided for in Dmitry's testament – but this ignored the provision that voided Yury's succession in the event of Vasily I producing a son).
_	Returning to the narrative from the stadium dedication: "There was one occasion during the time when government agencies were allocating moneys to municipalities for such projects, with the provision that the municipalities themselves also match the funds, that Bluefield was about to lose a large federal grant because the city had no matching fund," Nelson wrote.
_	In 1978, the Diocese of Peterborough donated an old church building, which became the Camp Director's Cottage, with the provision that it not be used for religious services.
_	The Australian delegation to the IWC has argued to repeal the provision that allows nations to harvest whales for scientific research, to no effect.
_	Together, the consuls passed a series of laws, including the exile of Marius and his supporters, a limiting of some of the powers of the tribunes, the expansion of the senate by adding some 300 additional senators, and the provision that all laws were to be reviewed by the Senate before being submitted to an assembly of the people.
_	Most important of all was the provision that laws could now only be carried in the Centuriate Assembly.
_	However, when confronted with the provision that he would have to relinquish his United States citizenship in order to accompany the Jamaican team to Seoul, he refused.
_	If no program exists at their university's campus, they may compete on the team for another campus of the same university, with the provision that they must leave that team should their home campus organize a program.
_	In April 1929 the hospital was the recipient of playwright J. M. Barrie's copyright to the "Peter Pan" works, with the provision that the income from this source not be disclosed.
_	Students are now randomly assigned to a residential college in the summer before their matriculation, with the provision that legacy students are allowed to choose whether to live in the same college as their alumnus parent or sibling.
_	The Supreme Court ruled unconstitutional the provision that imposed those duties as violating the Tenth Amendment, which reserves to the states and to the people those powers not granted to the federal government.
_	They objected to the provision that allowed the League to force the United States to join in a war declared by the League without the approval of Congress or the president.
_	Britain included the provision that the Somali residents would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	The Parlement only registered the edict with the provision that "in cases of necessity or abuse, it would administer the edict itself."
_	The agreement gave the French and the patriots the full honors of war, with their persons and property guaranteed, and included the provision that the garrisons of the forts could embark freely for France.
_	Thirdly, the treaty contained the provision that rebels designated by either of the two countries were to be banished.
_	In this version of the plan, the Air Force would declare that the aircraft were "excess property" and transfer them to GSA, who could then legally make the planes available to other government agencies, but with the provision that any agencies receiving them would be required to retain ownership.
_	Approving of the marriage, Henry Huddleston Rogers II gave the couple a $500,000 trust fund, with the provision that Peralta-Ramos "lay no future claim to the Rogers fortune, estimated at $40,000,000."
_	Some, such as the provision that banks could change name and location without an act of Congress, were adopted.
_	He therefore acquiesced to the ships' being armed with 28.3 cm guns, with the provision that they be upgunned to 38 cm at the earliest opportunity.
_	In 1852 he founded the Boston Public Library by giving $50,000 for that purpose, with the provision that the interest of the money should be expended for books of permanent value, and that the city should make adequate provision for at least 100 readers.
_	In the same fashion for medical school, the required time of education was considerably reduced from nine years (the minimum needed to obtain the title of MD in Medicine and Surgery) to almost five, with the provision that the diploma is not terminal anymore, and it is given with the title of "médico" (medic).
_	He agrees only with the provision that they not be told of his illness and imminent death.
_	Earlier editions limited one antiaircraft gun per territory, though later rules relaxed this to allow multiple antiaircraft guns on the provision that only one is functional at any time.
_	In early January 1942, Winston Churchill agreed to send one of these systems to Russia, but with the provision that it would be totally secured under British officers and operated by British technicians.
_	With "Pythagorean wit," he dazzles Macmillan and is to serve as a mathematical consultant for the pharmaco-kinetic modelling project, only under the provision that CalSci will administer the trials and monitor the drug at every step, all computational analyses are conducted by Charlie and his team, and 5% of the gross will go to third-world AIDS organizations chosen by Professors Eppes and Ramanujan .
_	This was contested before a court by the "Žemaitē bova, īr ė būs" ("Samogitians were, are and will be") Association, also named Ž"emaitiu soeiga", which considers that it is a violation of the Constitution, more particularly of the provision that everyone has the right to decide on his nationality.
_	Political parties were legalised by Rawlings—-with the provision that none could use names that had been used before—and a timetable was set for presidential and parliamentary elections.
_	Section 1 ("Members of Parliament etc") removes from the Mental Health Act 1983 the provision that disqualifies from the House of Commons a member sectioned for over six months under that Act. Section 2 ("Jurors") qualifies the restrictions of jury members who are receiving mental health treatment.
_	This invitation came with the provision that they used the flag of Southern Rhodesia as they had in 1964 instead of the new flag and used "God Save the Queen" as their anthem instead of "Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia".
_	In May 2008, the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America stated that they supported a revised version of the bill, but only on condition of "the continued inclusion of the provision that preempts state law".
_	Due to a show of unity by all the staff, the landlord agrees that they can stay, on the provision that they do something for him.
_	Production was with permission of the Tolkien Estate, with the provision that it would not be sold commercially.
_	UNOMIL was then established under the direction of the Secretary-General through his Special Representative for a period of seven months, subject to the provision that it will continue beyond 16 December 1993 only upon a review by the Council on whether progress had been made in implementing the agreement.
_	Mark Knopfler approved Yankovic's parody of the Dire Straits song "Money for Nothing" for use in the film "UHF" on the provision that Knopfler himself be allowed to play lead guitar on the parody which was later titled "Money for Nothing/Beverly Hillbillies*".
_	The US Department of Labor approved of the work model for schools in the Network, with the provision that students not have access to any dangerous worksite.
_	From this, a list of 200 was drawn up, with the highest 21 then put forward for further voting, on the provision that only one book per author was permitted in the top 21.
_	On his deathbed in 1070, Robert's brother Baldwin VI, Count of Flanders, left Flanders to his eldest son Arnulf III and Hainaut to the next oldest son Baldwin with the provision that if either preceded the other in death, he would inherit the other's county as well.
_	The American Cinematheque purchased the theatre from the city for $1 with the provision that this historical landmark would be restored to its original grandeur and re-opened as a movie theatre showcasing the organizations celebrated, public programming."
_	Membership in the Volunteer Companies was encouraged by the provision that once a militiaman had completed five years service in a Volunteer Company, he was exempted from further militia service.
_	Long also initiated the provision that allows a taxpayer to allocate $1 of taxes for a Presidential election campaign fund checkoff (the "dollar checkoff").
_	Intense lobbying of the county's budget committee resulted in partial restoration of the museum's budget, with the provision that "the organization come up with a plan to wean the museum from the general fund".
_	For the season-closing round in Bahrain, Toyota confirmed to the press that two cars would be fielded with the provision that neither car finished in Shanghai with major problems, although the No. 8 Toyota's suspension failure did not affect their decision.
_	These medals were furnished with the provision that these crosses be replaced when the supply of the second design was accomplished.
_	One of the laws passed by the Territorial Council of Florida that so alarmed Kingsley was the provision that mixed race children could not inherit property.
_	The Administrator of the War Shipping Administration will make the necessary arrangements for water transportation from the port of embarkation in Europe to the United States subject to the provision that the movement of immigrants will in no way interfere with the scheduled return of service personnel and their spouses and children from the European theater.
_	The French and the British agreed to abide by the request, with the provision that this was "upon the understanding that these same rules of warfare will be scrupulously observed by all of their opponents".
_	They deemed it to be of the required standard, with the provision that Annan install floodlights, which the club did before the start of their first season in the lowest tier of the Scottish Football League.
_	In his Will, Boyle provided money for a series of lectures to defend the Christian religion against those he considered "notorious infidels, namely atheists, deists, pagans, Jews and Muslims", with the provision that controversies between Christians were not to be mentioned (see Boyle Lectures).
_	Ramiro, the eldest but illegitimate son of Sancho by mistress Sancha of Aybar, was given property in the former county of Aragón with the provision that he should ask for no more lands of García, under whom he first acted as "baiulus" but from whom he later achieved "de facto" independence.
_	In 1963 the Trans-Karakoram Tract was transferred by treaty from Gilgit Agency to China under the provision that the settlement was subject to the final solution of the Kashmir dispute.
_	The permission to operate included the provision that the "Telefon Hírmondó" staff would write down the news reports in advance and have them signed by both the manager and the announcer, with copies of the pages sent three times a day to the Budapest Royal Prosecutor and the Budapest Police Department, plus the next day to the concerned ministries.
_	In 1811 parliament passed a bill granting half the expenses of building roads in northern Scotland, on the provision that landowners paid for the other half.
_	In 1917, his widow deposited thirty-two sealed boxes of especially valuable artworks at the Russian Museum (presumably to protect them during World War I) with the provision that they would become the museum's property if she had not reclaimed them within a year of the war's end.
_	The treaty, amongst other points, contained the provision that although the issue of this marriage would inherit the crowns of both England and Scotland, the latter kingdom should be "separate, apart and free in itself without subjection to the English Kingdom".
_	It established that all the Indian rulers were equal, with the provision that the "Queen of Pomunky" was now owed the ancient subjection of several scattered groups of Indians.
_	Other lands: Fidalgo Bay Resort, site of landings during the annual Canoe Journey; Huckleberry Island, which was granted to Samish by the State of Washington with the provision that it remain open for public use; additional acreage on Campbell Lake; agricultural land on Thomas Creek; a proposed commercial-development site on Highway 20 and Thompson Road in Anacortes; the Samish Nation administration complex on Commercial Avenue in downtown Anacortes; Samish Longhouse preschool and child care center; the Samish Health and Human Services building and property on Commercial Avenue in downtown Anacortes; and uplands and oyster beds on Mud Bay on Lopez Island.
_	Eventually Teófilo senior broke the news to his wife, who was furious; but she agreed to acquiesce on the provision that the boy was accompanied by his father.
_	After three days of talks and threats, Generals Mark Clark and Dwight Eisenhower compelled the Vichy Admiral François Darlan (and General Alphonse Juin) to order the cessation of armed resistance in Oran and Morocco by French forces on 10–11 November with the provision that Darlan would be head of a Free French administration.
_	In February 1680 the Reverend Ralph Davenant, rector of St Mary's Whitechapel, drew up his will, leaving all of his household goods and plate to his wife with the provision that it should eventually be sold and that the monies raised should be used to build a school for 40 boys of Whitechapel
_	The case was eventually resolved out of court, with the provision that Longet never discuss or write about the murder or the settlement.
_	The Constitution of the People's Republic of China makes the provision that women are equal to men, but in practice, traditional gender roles have persisted where men are considered "superior to women."
_	The Novgorodians continued to admit the enemies of Muscovy to their city in violation of the provision that they not make peace with the grand prince's enemies.
_	On September 6, 1939, Enzo Ferrari left Alfa Romeo under the provision that he won't use the Ferrari name in association with races or racing cars for at least four years.
_	He donated the land on the provision that no public houses were to be built within the estate.
_	The situation here was not that the statute did not "explicitly" set forth a standard of review, but rather that the statute did explicitly set forth such a standard, but then excised from the statute the provision that established the standard.
_	This grant was made with the provision that after the investors collected tolls for 40 years, the bridge would fall into public hands.
_	Likewise, 18 U.S.C. § 3742(e), the provision that governed the handling of appeals from sentences, also had to be severed and excised, because that provision was inextricably linked with the provision that made the Guidelines mandatory.
_	Act had the provision that the Church in Wales parishes would no longer receive endowments granted to them after 1662 (though this was later compensated for by the Welsh Church (Temporalities) Act 1919).
_	In 1954, the Vafoss Power Plant was put into operation on the dam by Skagerak Kraft, with the provision that one of its turbines would be used to power the pulp mill.
_	The building housed the Dominion Museum, the National Art Gallery of New Zealand and the New Zealand Academy of Fine Arts (who had sold their land and donated the proceeds to the new organisation on the provision that they would be accommodated).
_	His witch power is revealed to be the charm power, and he is allowed to attend Suzaku on the provision that he later take and pass the entrance exams on his own accord.
_	Steps to resolve this included the provision that even if a Greek Cypriot moved to the north, they would still vote in the elections of the Greek Cypriot state, except for municipal elections.
_	In hockey, the Stanley Cup was initially open only to Canadian teams, but in 1914, the Cup's trustees allowed American teams to compete, with the provision that the Stanley Cup winners were to be recognized as "World's Champions".
_	Other sources of open-source hardware production are vendors of chips and other electronic components sponsoring contests with the provision that the participants and winners must share their designs.
_	The primary provision under debate was the provision that would defund the Affordable Care Act (colloquially known as Obamacare).
_	Budd Boetticher, a long term-resident of Mexico renowned for his series of Randolph Scott westerns, wrote the original 1967 screenplay that was bought with the provision that he would direct.
_	This was the second provision that received unfavorable notice over a year after the Patriot's Act passage; the other was the provision that allowed the administration to indefinitely appoint interim U.S. attorneys, a key part of the Dismissal of U.S. attorneys controversy.
_	This bill passed; however, it was gutted of the provision that would keep Joseph Kabila in power until a census took place.
_	When a new constitution was ultimately adopted that year, it included the provision that Hungarians "do not recognize the communist constitution of 1949, since it was the basis for tyrannical rule".
_	The law created an excise tax on ammunition, archery equipment, handguns, and hunting firearms, and apportioned the revenue among state wildlife agencies on a matching funds basis (with the provision that each state ban the diversion of hunting and fishing license revenue to other uses).
_	This contract may include the provision that the debtor may repay the debt in kind, lending the same amount to a similarly disadvantaged party once they have the means, and under the same conditions.
_	From the original seven applicants, three serious contenders emerged and the contract was awarded in August 1960 to "North of Scotland Television Limited" on the provision that board positions were offered to the other two final applicants, "Caledonian Television" and "North Caledonian Television".
_	The Act also makes the provision that in any future UK-wide referendum the chairperson of the Electroal Commission is appointed “Chief Counting Officer” for the United Kingdom or gives the power for the chairperson to appoint a Chief Counting Officer.
_	The college property was later sold to the Troy Village School District in 1929, under the provision that the name "Buchanan" remain.
_	The Novel, following the principles on agrarian legislation established by Romanos I (r. 920–944), demanded the return to the peasants of any land allotted by the state which they had been forced to sell to the magnates (the "dynatoi"), with the provision that the price of the land should be repaid in full except by the poorest peasants.
_	In return, the British agreed to assign control over their Polaris missile targeting to the SACEUR (Supreme Allied Commander, Europe), with the provision that in a national emergency when unsupported by the NATO allies, the targeting, permission to fire, and firing of those Polaris missiles would reside with the British national authorities.
